Washington statutes.
RCW 18.265.030

Licensing requirements.

(1) The department shall issue a license to practice as a dental therapist to any applicant who:

(a) Pays any applicable fees established by the secretary under RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250;

(b) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, successfully completes a dental therapist program that is accredited or has received initial accreditation by the American dental association's commission on dental accreditation;

(c) Passes an examination approved by the commission; and

(d) Submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's name, address, and other applicable information as determined by the secretary.

(2) Applicants who successfully completed a dental therapist program before September 30, 2022, that was not accredited by the American dental association's commission on dental accreditation but that the commission determines is substantially equivalent to an accredited education program meet the criteria described in subsection (1)(b) of this section if the applicant also , has proof of at least 400 preceptorship hours under the close supervision of a dentist.

(3) When considering and approving the exam under subsection (1)(c) of this section, the committee must consult with tribes that license dental health aide therapists and with dental therapy education programs located in this state.

(4) The secretary in consultation with the commission must establish by rule the procedures to implement this section.

[ 2023 c 460 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.